Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Cross references. —

For constitutional provision prohibiting monopolies and perpetuities, see art. 1, § 30, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no private property shall be taken or damaged for public or private use without just compensation, see art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const.

For provision declaring water to be state property, see art. 8, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 to 19, Wyo. Const.

As to inapplicability of §§

1-3-101

to

1-3-119

, relative to limitations of actions, in the case of a continuing and subsisting trust, or in an action by a vendee of real property in possession thereof, to obtain a conveyance, see §

1-3-101

.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

to

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to partition of real estate, see §§

1-32-101

to

1-32-122

.

For provision that failure of creditors to apply for letters testamentary, etc., shall not affect the lien upon encumbered property secured by valid mortgage or deed of trust in case of real property, or by security agreement under the UCC, see §

2-4-212

.

As to sale of real and personal property by conservator, see §§

3-3-607

.

As to offenses against property generally, see §§

6-3-101

to

6-3-901

.

As to gifts, escheats and forfeitures to state generally, see §§

9-5-201

to

9-5-205

.

As to ownership of airspace and intrusions therein, see §§

10-4-301

to

10-4-304

.

As to sale of personal property and real estate in connection with insolvency and liquidation of banks, see §

13-4-401

.

As to municipal zoning generally, see §§

15-1-601

to

15-1-611

.

As to assessments against property in connection with local improvements in cities and towns, see §

15-6-401

et seq.

For duties of county clerk with respect to records, see §

18-3-402

.

As to mechanics and other similar liens generally, see title 29.

As to licensing of real estate brokers and of salesmen, see §§

33-28-101

to

33-28-124

.

As to property subject to taxation, see §

39-11-103

et seq.

As to listing real property for taxation annually, see §

39-13-103

.

As to assessment of all property at fair value, see §

39-13-103

.

As to enforcement and collection of taxes see §

39-13-108

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of real estate buyer's efforts to secure financing upon which sale is contingent, 78 ALR3d 880.

Determination of price under testamentary option to buy real estate, 13 ALR4th 947.

Landlord's tort liability to tenant for personal injury or property damage resulting from criminal conduct of employee, 38 ALR4th 240.

Oil and gas royalty as real or personal property, 56 ALR4th 539.

Air-conditioning appliance, equipment or apparatus as fixture, 69 ALR4th 359.

Specificity of description of premises as affecting enforceability of lease, 73 ALR4th 236.

Apportionment of liability between landowners and assailants for injuries to crime victims, 54 ALR5th 379.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
93.04 (Matthew Bender).